Texas, session 892, HB174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter B, Chapter 305, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 305.0301 to read as follows: Sec. 305.0301.  PROHIBITED REPRESENTATION OF BOTH POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS AND PRIVATE ENTITIES.  (a)  In this section, "political subdivision" has the meaning assigned by Section 305.026. (b)  A registrant may not represent, including under a contract, a client that is a political subdivision that imposes a tax if the registrant also represents any client that is a private entity or person. SECTION 2.  Section 305.0301, Government Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a contract for the representation of a client described by that section that is entered into on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.